Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5522
Number of new employees, defined.

Number of new employees means the excess of the number of equivalent employees employed at the project during a year over the number of equivalent employees during the base year.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 22.